District of Columbia statutes.
28:1-205

Reasonable time; seasonableness.

(a)

Whether a time for taking an action required by this subtitle is reasonable depends on the nature, purpose, and circumstances of the action.

(b)

An action is taken seasonably if it is taken at or within the time agreed or, if no time is agreed, at or within a reasonable time.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 636, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 2, 60 DCR 2634
2001 Ed., § 28:1-204(2), (3).
1981 Ed., § 28:1-205.
1973 Ed., § 28:1-205.

Source: Former Section 1-204(2)-(3).

Changes from former law: This section is derived from subsections (2) and (3) of former Section 1-204. Subsection (1) of that section is now incorporated in Section 1-302(b).

1. Subsection (a) makes it clear that requirements that actions be taken within a “reasonable” time are to be applied in the transactional context of the particular action.

2. Under subsection (b), the agreement that fixes the time need not be part of the main agreement, but may occur separately. Notice also that under the definition of “agreement” ( Section 1-201) the circumstances of the transaction, including course of dealing or usages of trade or course of performance may be material. On the question what is a reasonable time these matters will often be important.